District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.02a

Administration.

The Mayor shall administer and decide all questions arising under this chapter. The Mayor may delegate to the City Administrator any of the powers conferred on him or her by this chapter, except disability compensation hearings and adjudication powers, pursuant to § 1-623.28, which shall be exercised by the Director of the Department of Employment Services.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2302a
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1203(b), 48 DCR 6981
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 2003, 50 DCR 5668
D.C. Law 15-39 substituted “to the City Administrator” for “to the Director of Personnel”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-202, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 12020).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1103(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) transfer of property, records, and unexpended funds to the Office of Risk Management, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-400, June 26, 2002, 49 DCR 6526).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-476, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9568).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer and Risk Management Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-88, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4330).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer and Risk Management Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-128, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6836).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Disability Compensation Program Transfer and Risk Management Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-172, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9173).